test/src/morphology/adj_Ulik_S_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator.gt.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser.gt.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator.gt.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser.gt.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against Marit/Maja
# ? = not checked
# c = Comp or Superl attested in corpus

Tests:

  Adjective - båeries: # c 
    båeries+A+Attr: båeries 
    båeries+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [båarasabpa, båarasåbpoe]
    båeries+A+Sg+Nom: båeries 
    båeries+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [båarasommes, båarasammes]
    
  Adjective - dearkoes: # 
    dearkoes+A+Attr: dearkoes 
    dearkoes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [dearkoesabpa, dearkoesåbpoe]
    dearkoes+A+Sg+Nom: dearkoes 
    dearkoes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [dearkoesommes, dearkasammes]
  
   
  Adjective - dasmoes: # 
    dasmoes+A+Attr: dasmoes 
    dasmoes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [dasmoesabpa, dasmoesåbpoe]
    dasmoes+A+Sg+Nom: dasmoes 
    dasmoes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [dasmoesommes, dasmasammes]
    
    
  Adjective - dåsmoes: # 
    dåsmoes+A+Attr: dåsmoes 
    dåsmoes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [dåsmasabpa, dåsmoesåbpoe]
    dåsmoes+A+Sg+Nom: dåsmoes 
    dåsmoes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [dåsmoesommes, dåsmasabpa]
    
    
  Adjective - gieries: # 
    gieries+A+Attr: gieries 
    gieries+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [gearahkabpa, gearahkåbpoe]
    gieries+A+Sg+Nom: gearehke 
    gieries+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [gearahkommes, gearahkammes]
       
  Adjective - gööles: # 
    gööles+A+Attr: gööles 
    gööles+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [göölesabpa, göölesåbpoe]
    gööles+A+Sg+Nom: gööles 
    gööles+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [göölesommes, göölesammes] 
    
  Adjective - jearsoes: # 
    jearsoes+A+Attr: jearsoes 
    jearsoes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [jearsoesåbpoe, jearsasabpa]
    jearsoes+A+Sg+Nom: jearsoes 
    jearsoes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [jearsoesommes, jearsasammes]
    
    
  Adjective - seadtoes: # c 
    seadtoes+A+Attr: seadtoes 
    seadtoes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [seadtasabpa, seadtoesåbpoe]
    seadtoes+A+Sg+Nom: seadtoes 
    seadtoes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [seadtoesommes, seadtasammes]
    
  Adjective - seakoes: # 
    seakoes+A+Attr: seakoes 
    seakoes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [seakoesabpa, seakoesåbpoe]
    seakoes+A+Sg+Nom: seakoes 
    seakoes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [seakoesommes, seakasammes]    
    
  Adjective - tjïrkes: # 
    tjïrkes+A+Attr: tjïrkes 
    tjïrkes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [tjïrkesabpa, tjïrkesåbpoe]
    tjïrkes+A+Sg+Nom: tjïrkes 
    tjïrkes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [tjïrkesommes, tjïrkesammes]
       
  Adjective - varres: # 
    varres+A+Attr: varres 
    varres+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [varresabpa, varresåbpoe]
    varres+A+Sg+Nom: varres 
    varres+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [varresommes, varresammes] 
       
  Adjective - voeres: # 
    voeres+A+Attr: voeres 
    voeres+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [voeresabpa, voeresåbpoe]
    voeres+A+Sg+Nom: voeres 
    voeres+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [voeresammes, voeresommes]
  
  
    
